apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="sl/ay__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ays</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aying</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aying</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aying</l>
          <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>      
    
<pardef n="slid/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    
<pardef n="br/eak__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eak</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eak</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaks</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oke</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oken</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaking</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaking</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaking</l>
          <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    
<pardef n="sp/in__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>                 
    
<pardef n="st/ave__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aves</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aved</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aved</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>     
    
<pardef n="st/eal__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eal</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eal</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eals</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ole</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olen</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealing</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealing</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ealing</l>
          <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>        
    
<pardef n="step__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ped</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ping</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ping</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ping</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

<e lm="break"><i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speak"><i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stop"><i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
 <e lm="step"><i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="step into"><i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="wrap"><i>wrap</i> <par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="steal"><i>st</i> <par n="st/eal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lap"><i>lap</i><par n="step__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="drip"><i>drip</i><par n="step__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="prop"><i>prop</i><par n="step__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="overlap"><i>overlap</i><par n="step__vblex" /></e>
